District of Columbia statutes.
10-1121.10

Rules; enforcement.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

A violation of this subchapter or a rule issued in accordance with this subchapter may be punished by imprisonment of not more than 90 days.

(c)

The Mayor may maintain an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to enjoin any continuing violation of this subchapter or a rule issued in accordance with this subchapter.

(d)

Civil fines and penalties may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter or any rules promulgated under the authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.] (“Civil Infractions Act”). Enforcement and adjudication of an infraction shall be pursuant to the Civil Infractions Act.

(e)

The Mayor may also enforce this subchapter or a rule issued in accordance with this subchapter pursuant to §  50-921.19(a), (c), (d), (e), and (f).

History

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1168, Pub. L. 90-598, § 11
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(27)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 428, 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-207, § 7, 61 DCR 12690

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1040.
1973 Ed., § 7-950.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-207 rewrote this section.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-207: Section 12(a) of D.C. Law 20-207 provided that §§ 2(a), 2(b)(1), 2(b)(2)(A), 2(b)(2)(B), 2(b)(2)(C), 2(c), 3, 4, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, and 11 shall apply as of March 11, 2015.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.